Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1917.01
Limited computed tomography radiographer; requirements; nuclear medicine technologist; activities authorized.

(1) A person licensed by the department, with the recommendation of the board, as a limited computed tomography radiographer may practice medical radiography restricted to computed tomography. An applicant for a license as a limited computed tomography radiographer shall:

(a) Complete an application in accordance with the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(b) Be certified by (i) the Nuclear Medicine Technology Certification Board or (ii) the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists in nuclear medicine technology; and

(c) Be certified by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists in computed tomography.

(2) A nuclear medicine technologist may perform computed tomography without being licensed under the Medical Radiography Practice Act if such practice is limited to X-rays produced by a combination nuclear medicine-computed tomography system and administered as an integral part of a nuclear medicine procedure that uses a computed tomography protocol for purposes of attenuation correction and anatomical localization only and if the nuclear medicine technologist has received documented device-specific training on the combination nuclear medicine-computed tomography system.

Laws 2008, LB928, § 11.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.